Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-212
School lands; sale; public auction required.

No lands now owned or hereafter acquired by the state for educational purposes shall be sold except at public auction.

Laws 1921, c. 80, § 2, p. 290;

C.S.1922, § 5191;

Laws 1923, c. 61, § 1, p. 185;

Laws 1925, c. 135, § 1, p. 354;

Laws 1929, c. 188, § 1, p. 652;

C.S.1929, § 72-211;

Laws 1931, c. 118, § 1, p. 345;

Laws 1935, c. 164, § 1, p. 611;

Laws 1941, c. 145, § 1, p. 576;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-211;

Laws 1943, c. 160, § 1, p. 573;

R.S.1943, § 72-212.

Under former statute, state board had no authority to dispose of mineral rights in school lands. Briggs v. Neville, 103 Neb. 1, 170 N.W. 188 (1918).

The power of the Board of Commissioners to lease, sell, or dispose of school lands exists only insofar as it is directed or permitted by the Legislature. Fawn Lake Ranch Co. v. Cumbow, 102 Neb. 288, 167 N.W. 75 (1918).